Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5751.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 224. (1) A person shall not manufacture, sell, offer for sale, or possess any of the following: (a) A machine gun or firearm that shoots or is designed to shoot automatically more than 1 shot without manual reloading, by a single function of the trigger. (b) A muffler or silencer. (c) A bomb or bombshell. (d) A blackjack, slungshot, billy, metallic knuckles, sand club, sand bag, or bludgeon. (e) A device, weapon, cartridge, container, or contrivance designed to render a person temporarily or permanently disabled by the ejection, release, or emission of a gas or other substance. (f) A bump stock. (g) A multiburst trigger activator. (2) A person who that violates subsection (1) is guilty of a felony , punishable by imprisonment for not more than 5 years, or a fine of not more than $2,500.00, or both. (3) Subsection (1) does not apply to any of the following: (a) A self-defense spray or foam device as defined in section 224d. (b) A person manufacturing firearms, explosives, or munitions of war by virtue of a contract with a department of the government of the United States. (c) A person licensed by the secretary Secretary of the treasury Treasury of the United States or the secretary's Secretary's delegate to manufacture, sell, or possess a machine gun, or a device, weapon, cartridge, container, or contrivance described in subsection (1). (4) As used in this chapter: , "muffler" (a) "Bump stock" means a device that allows a semiautomatic firearm to shoot more than 1 shot with a single pull of the trigger by harnessing the recoil energy of the semiautomatic firearm to which the device is affixed so that the trigger resets and continues firing without additional physical manipulation of the trigger by the shooter. (b) "Muffler" or "silencer" means 1 or more of the following: (i) (a) A device for muffling, silencing, or deadening the report of a firearm. (ii) (b) A combination of parts, designed or redesigned, and intended for use in assembling or fabricating a muffler or silencer. (iii) (c) A part, designed or redesigned, and intended only for use in assembling or fabricating a muffler or silencer. (c) "Multiburst trigger activator" means any of the following: (i) A device designed or redesigned to be attached to, built into, or used in conjunction with a semiautomatic firearm that allows the firearm to discharge 2 or more shots in a burst by activating the device. (ii) A manual or power-driven trigger activating device constructed and designed so that when attached to, built into, or used in conjunction with a semiautomatic firearm, it increases the rate of fire of that firearm. (iii) A device designed or redesigned to be attached to, built into, or used in conjunction with a semiautomatic firearm that enhances the firing rate of a firearm to mimic rapid or automatic fire. (d) Multiburst trigger activator includes, but is not limited to, any of the following devices: (i) A device placed within the trigger guard of a firearm that uses a spring to push back against the recoil of the firearm causing the finger in the trigger guard to move back and forth and rapidly activate the trigger. (ii) A mechanical device that activates the trigger of the firearm in rapid succession by turning a crank. (iii) Any aftermarket trigger or trigger system that, if installed, allows more than 1 round to be fired with a single depression of the trigger.